Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 8
ELECTRONIC SYSTEM

31-10-801. Use of electronic system.

An electronic voting system may be used in any municipal election if the governing body authorizes its use. The adoption and use of an electronic voting system for municipal elections shall be in accordance with the provisions for the adoption and use of such system for general and primary elections insofar as such provisions are applicable to municipal elections.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1055, § 1, effective July 1.

31-10-802. Sample ballots.

Sample ballots shall be printed and in the possession of the clerk ten days before the election and shall be subject to public inspection. Such ballots shall be in the form of the official ballot but shall be printed on paper of a different color from the official ballot. The clerk shall provide that at least two sample ballots for each election precinct are delivered to the judges of election and posted in the polling place on election day.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1055, § 1, effective July 1.

31-10-803. Ballots - electronic voting.

Ballot pages or ballot cards placed upon voting devices shall be, so far as practicable, in the same order of arrangement as provided by section 31-10-902 for paper ballots; except that they shall be of the size and design required by the vote recorder or the electronic vote counting equipment, or both the vote recorder and the electronic vote counting equipment, and may be printed on a number of separate pages which are placed on the voting device or on one or more ballot cards.

If votes are recorded on a ballot card, a separate write-in ballot may be provided, which may be in the form of a paper ballot or envelope on which the voter may write in the titles of the office and the names of persons not on the printed ballot for whom he wishes to vote.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1055, § 1, effective July 1.

31-10-804. Preparation for use - electronic voting.

Prior to an election in which an electronic voting system is to be used, the clerk shall have the vote recorders or punching devices, or both the vote recorders and punching devices, prepared for voting and shall inspect and determine that each such recorder or device is in proper working order and shall cause a sufficient number of such recorders or devices to be delivered to each election precinct in which the electronic voting system is to be used.

The clerk shall supply each election precinct in which vote recorders or voting devices are to be used with a sufficient number of ballot cards, sample ballots, ballot boxes, write-in ballots, if required, and other supplies and forms as may be required. Each ballot card shall have a serially numbered stub attached, which shall be removed by a judge of election before the card is deposited in the ballot box.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1055, § 1, effective July 1.

31-10-805. Instructions to vote.

In case any voter, after commencing to vote, asks for further instructions concerning the manner of voting, a judge shall give such instructions to him; but no judge or other election officer or person assisting such voter shall request, suggest, or seek to persuade or induce any such voter to vote for any particular ticket, or for any particular candidate, or for or against any particular amendment, question, or proposition. After receiving such instructions, such voter shall vote as in the case of an unassisted voter.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1056, § 1, effective July 1.

31-10-806. Ballots.

The clerk of each municipality using an electronic voting system shall provide sufficient ballots for every municipal election. The official ballots shall be printed and in the possession of the clerk at least ten days before the election.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1056, § 1, effective July 1.

31-10-807. Distribution of ballots.

In municipalities using an electronic voting system, the clerk shall distribute to the election judges in the respective precincts a sufficient number of ballots. The ballots shall be sent in one or more sealed packages for each precinct with marks on the outside of each stating clearly the precinct and polling place for which it is intended, together with the number of ballots enclosed. Such package shall be delivered to one of the judges of election of such precinct between the close of business on the Friday preceding election day, or during any earlier day in which a judges' school of instruction is held, and 8 p.m. on the Monday before election day. A receipt for the ballots thus delivered shall be given by the election judge who received them. The receipt shall be filed with the clerk, who shall also keep a record of the time when and the manner in which each of said packages was sent and delivered.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1056, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1505, § 25, effective July 1.

31-10-808. Cards of instruction.

The clerk shall furnish to the judges of election of each precinct a sufficient number of instruction cards for the guidance of voters in preparing their ballots. The election judges shall post at least one card in each polling place on the day of election. Such cards shall be printed in large, clear type and shall contain full instructions to the voter as to what should be done:

To obtain a ballot for voting;

To prepare the ballot for deposit in the ballot box;

To obtain a new ballot in the place of one spoiled by accident or mistake; and

To obtain assistance in marking ballots.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1056, § 1, effective July 1.

31-10-809. Close of polls - count and seals in electronic voting.

After the polls have been closed, the election judges shall secure the vote recorders or the voting devices, or both the vote recorders and the voting devices, against further use and prepare a ballot return in duplicate showing the number of voters as indicated by the pollbook who have voted in the precinct, the number of official ballot cards received, and the number of spoiled and unused ballot cards returned. The original copy of said ballot return shall be deposited in a metal or durable plastic transfer box, along with all voted and spoiled ballots. The transfer box shall then be sealed in such a way as to prevent tampering with the box or its contents. The clerk shall provide such a numbered seal. The duplicate copy of said ballot return shall be mailed at the nearest post office or post box to the clerk by a judge other than the one who delivers the transfer box to the counting center. One judge shall deliver the sealed transfer box to the counting center or other place designated by the clerk.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1056, § 1, effective July 1.

31-10-810. Electronic vote counting - test.

The clerk shall have the electronic ballot counting equipment tested in the manner prescribed in this section to ascertain that it will accurately count the votes cast for all offices and all measures. The electronic equipment shall be tested at least three times, once on the day before the election, again just prior to the start of the count on election day, and finally at the conclusion of the counting. The clerk may make any additional tests he deems necessary.

The clerk shall vote and retain at least one hundred test ballots, and shall observe the tabulation of all test ballots by means of the electronic counting equipment, and shall compare such tabulation with the previously retained records of the test vote count. The cause of any discrepancies shall be corrected prior to the actual vote tabulation.

All test materials, when not in use, shall be kept in a metal box, and the clerk shall be the custodian of the box.

After the final conclusion of the counting, all programs, test materials, and ballots shall be sealed and retained as provided for paper ballots.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1057, § 1, effective July 1.

31-10-811. Electronic vote counting - procedure.

All proceedings at the counting center shall be under the direction of the clerk and shall be conducted under the observation of watchers, so far as practicable, in accordance with the provisions of part 6 of this article; but no persons except those authorized for the purpose shall touch any ballot or ballot card or return. All persons who are engaged in the processing and counting of the ballots shall be deputized in writing and take an oath that they will faithfully perform their assigned duties. If any ballot is damaged or defective so that it cannot properly be counted by the electronic vote counting equipment, a true duplicate copy shall be made of the damaged ballot in the presence of two witnesses. The duplicate ballot shall be substituted for the damaged ballot. All duplicate ballots shall be clearly labeled as such and shall bear a serial number which shall be recorded on the damaged ballot.

The return printed by the electronic vote tabulating equipment, to which have been added write-in votes, shall constitute, when certified by the clerk, the official return of each precinct. The clerk may from time to time release unofficial returns. Upon completion of the count, the official returns shall be open to the public.

Absentee ballots shall be counted at the counting center in the same manner as precinct ballots. Write-in ballots may be counted in their precincts by the precinct judges of election or at the counting center, but, before any write-in vote is counted, it shall be compared with votes cast for the same office on the ballot card to ascertain whether the write-in vote is valid. If the voter has cast more votes for the office than he is lawfully entitled to vote, the word "void" shall be written across the write-in vote, and it shall not be counted. Votes cast for a nominated candidate whose name appears on the ballot shall not be voided because of an invalid write-in vote for the same office.

If for any reason it becomes impracticable to count all or a part of the ballots with electronic vote tabulating equipment, the clerk may direct that they be counted manually, following as far as practicable the provisions governing the counting of paper ballots.

The receiving, opening, and preservation of the transfer boxes and their contents shall be the responsibility of the clerk, who shall provide adequate personnel and facilities to assure accurate and complete election results. Any indication of tampering with the ballots or ballot cards or other fraudulent action shall be immediately reported to the municipal attorney who shall immediately investigate such action and report in writing within ten days his findings to the clerk and shall prosecute to the full extent of the law any person responsible for such fraudulent action. The conduct of municipal elections when electronic voting systems are used shall follow, as nearly as practicable, the conduct of general and primary elections when such systems are used.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1057, § 1, effective July 1.

31-10-812. Election laws apply - separate absentee ballots permitted.

All of the provisions of this article not inconsistent with the provisions of this part 8 shall apply to all elections held in precincts where an electronic voting system is used. Nothing in this part 8 shall prohibit the use of a separate paper ballot by absentee voters or for charter amendments where such is required.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1058, § 1, effective July 1.